Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 4911.
Duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure under this chapter;

receive applications for licensure and provide licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer; and

explain appeal procedures to persons licensed under this chapter and to applicants and complaint procedures to the public.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4912.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint three persons in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 129b

for three-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to applied behavior analysis. One of the initial appointments shall be for less than a three-year term.

Two of these appointees shall be applied behavior analysts.

An applied behavior analyst advisor appointee shall have not less than three years’ experience as an applied behavior analyst immediately preceding appointment, shall be licensed as an applied behavior analyst in Vermont, and shall be actively engaged in the practice of applied behavior analysis in this State during incumbency.

Not more than one of these appointees may be employed by a designated agency. As used in this subdivision, “designated agency” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 7252

.

One of these appointees shall be the parent of an individual with autism or a developmental disorder who is a recipient of applied behavior analysis services. This appointee shall not have a child or other family member who is receiving applied behavior analysis services from one of the advisor appointees appointed under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.